Hawaii, session 2026, SB2435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the adoption of electric vehicles in the State continues to grow at increasing rates, with electric vehicle adoption in the State increasing by fifteen per cent between November 2024 and November 2025.  As the number of electric vehicles registered in the State continues to rise, there is a need for charging infrastructure to support this growth and ensure an equitable transition to clean transportation. The legislature further finds that providing electric vehicle charging options at workplaces is beneficial for several reasons.  Workplace charging provides the opportunity for people who may not be able to charge at home, including renters, those who live in apartments, and low- and moderate-income families, to participate in the savings and other benefits of owning an electric vehicle.  Workplace charging also encourages daytime charging, which benefits the grid by shifting energy use from peak evening hours to daytime hours, when energy is cheaper and cleaner. Therefore, the legislature finds that there is a need for more workplace charging and that the State should expand workplace charging availability in state facilities. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish a state goal to retrofit state facilities to be electric vehicle charger-ready; (2)  Require the design of all new state building construction that includes parking to ensure that at least ten per cent of parking stalls are electric vehicle charger-ready; (3)  Require the Hawaii state energy office to conduct a survey and identify certain high-priority state facilities that include parking to be retrofitted to include electric vehicle charging infrastructure; and (4)  Appropriate funds to the Hawaii state energy office to assess the costs of, and install, retrofits and electric vehicle charging systems at high-priority state facilities. SECTION 2.  Chapter 107, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§107-    Electric vehicle charger-ready retrofits; state goal.  It shall be the goal of the State to retrofit state facilities to be electric vehicle charger-ready." SECTION 3.  Section 107-21, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new definitions to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Alternating current Level 2 charging station" has the same meaning as defined in section 269-72. "Electric vehicle charger-ready" means having sufficient wiring conduits, raceways, and termination points to support a minimum 40‑ampere, 208- or 240-volt branch circuit, and sufficient electrical panel capacity to provide Level 2 charging consistent with an alternating current Level 2 charging station." SECTION 4.  Section 107-27, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§107-27  Design of state buildings.  (a)  No later than one year after the adoption of codes or standards pursuant to section 107-24(c), the design of all state building construction shall be in compliance with the Hawaii state building codes[, except state].  State building construction [shall be allowed to] may be exempted from: (1)  County codes that have not adopted the Hawaii state building codes; (2)  Any county code amendments that are inconsistent with the minimum performance objectives of the Hawaii state building codes or the objectives enumerated in this part; or (3)  Any county code amendments that are contrary to code amendments adopted by another county. (b) Exemptions shall include county ordinances allowing the exercise of indigenous Hawaiian architecture adopted in accordance with section 46-1.55. (c) The State shall consider hurricane resistant criteria when designing and constructing new public schools for the capability of providing shelter refuge. (d) Beginning July 1, 2023, where feasible and cost‑effective, the design of all new state building construction shall: (1)  Maximize energy and water efficiency measures; (2)  Maximize energy generation potential; and (3)  Use building materials that reduce the carbon footprint of the project. (e)  Beginning July 1, 2027, the design of all new state building construction that includes parking shall ensure that at least ten per cent of parking stalls are electric vehicle charger-ready." SECTION 5.  (a) The Hawaii state energy office, in consultation with the department of accounting and general services, department of transportation, and all other state agencies that own or manage state facilities that include parking, shall survey existing state facilities statewide that include parking and prioritize retrofitting these state facilities in accordance with readily available information, including location, expected future demand for charging, estimated costs for retrofits of parking stalls, other make-ready work, other planned improvements that would allow for electric vehicle charger-ready retrofit work to be performed at the same time, and other factors that the Hawaii state energy office deems relevant. (b) The Hawaii state energy office shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027.  The report shall include the results of the survey conducted pursuant to subsection (a), identifying between four to ten high-priority state facilities to be retrofitted to include electric vehicle charging infrastructure and the estimated costs for these retrofits. SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to conduct detailed cost assessments to determine the cost to install, or contract for the installation of, retrofits and electric vehicle charging systems at the high-priority state facilities identified pursuant to section 5 of this Act and to perform, or contract for, these installations; provided that the appropriation authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided further that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2525.